Alaska, session 34, HB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.17.430 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 14.17.430. State funding for correspondence study. Except as provided 06 in AS 14.17.400(b), funding for the state centralized correspondence study program or 07 a district correspondence program, including a district that offers a statewide 08 correspondence study program, includes an allocation from the public education fund 09 in an amount calculated by 10 (1) multiplying the ADM of the correspondence program by 90 11 percent; 12 (2) multiplying the number obtained under (1) of this section by 13 the special needs factor set out in AS 14.17.420(a)(1); 14 (3) adding the number obtained under (2) of this section to the 01 number obtained for intensive services under AS 14.17.420(a)(2). 02 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.